District of Columbia statutes.
51-123

Right to amend or repeal reserved.

All rights, privileges, or immunities conferred by this subchapter or by acts done pursuant thereto shall exist subject to the power of Congress to amend or repeal this subchapter at any time.

History

Aug. 28, 1935, 49 Stat. 956, ch. 794, § 23
June 4, 1943, 57 Stat. 125, ch. 117, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 46-124.
1973 Ed., § 46-323.